Washington statutes.
RCW 19.174.090

Compliance evidence of adequate safety measures.

Compliance with the objective standards and information requirements of this chapter is prima facie evidence that the operator of the automated teller machine or night deposit facility in question has provided adequate measures for the safety of users of the automated teller machine or night depository.

[ 1993 c 324 s 9.]